Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1389.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; MICROPLASTICS IN MEAT AND POULTRY STUDY.new text end new text begin $1,500,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of agriculture to study, in consultation with the commissioner of health and the University of Minnesota, the presence of microplastics in meat and poultry sold or offered for sale in Minnesota. The commissioner of agriculture may contract with a private laboratory or other entities as necessary to perform the study. No later than February 1, 2026, the commissioner must report findings and recommendations to the legislative committees with jurisdiction over agriculture and health. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end